District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.12

Certain delegated functions; functions of certain agencies.

No function of the District of Columbia Council (established under Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967) or of the Commissioner of the District of Columbia which such District of Columbia Council or Commissioner has delegated to an officer, employee, or agency (including any body of or under such agency) of the District, nor any function now vested pursuant to § 501 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 in the District Public Service Commission, Zoning Advisory Council, Board of Zoning Adjustment, Office of the Recorder of Deeds, or Armory Board, or in any officer, employee, or body of or under such agency, shall be considered as a function transferred to the Council pursuant to § 1-204.04(a). Each such function is hereby transferred to the officer, employee, or agency (including any body of or under such agency), to whom or to which it was delegated, or in whom or in which it has remained vested, until the Mayor or Council established under this chapter, or both, pursuant to the powers herein granted, shall revoke, modify, or transfer such delegation or vesting.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 818, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 712
This section is referenced in § 1-207.71.
1981 Ed., § 1-212.
1973 Ed., § 1-132.